Illinois, session 104th, HB558.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Facilities Closure Act is amended by 5changing Section 5-1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 608/5-1)7    Sec. 5-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8State Facilities Closure Act. All references in this Article 9to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 95-331, eff. 8-21-07.)